Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 37.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201086-501
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-501 to 86-530 shall be known and may be cited
as the Information Technology Infrastructure Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1190, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 1349, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-1190;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 271;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 37.
April 15, 2010